Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.041

Unlawful possession of firearms—Restoration of right to possess.

(1) A person who is prohibited from possession of a firearm under RCW 9.41.040 may not petition a court to have the person's right to possess a firearm restored if the person has been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity of: A felony sex offense; a class A felony; or a felony offense with a maximum sentence of at least 20 years.

(2) A person who is prohibited from possession of a firearm under RCW 9.41.040, and is not disqualified from petitioning for restoration of firearm rights under subsection (1) of this section or required to petition as provided for in RCW 9.41.047, may petition a superior court to have the person's right to possess a firearm restored.

(a) The person must have, for the period of consecutive years as specified below immediately preceding the filing of the petition, been in the community without being convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity of any crime that prohibits the possession of a firearm, as follows:

(i) Five years for a conviction or finding of not guilty by reason of insanity for any felony offense, or any of the following gross misdemeanor or misdemeanor offenses:

(A) Domestic violence (RCW 10.99.020);

(B) Stalking;

(C) Cyberstalking;

(D) Cyber harassment, excluding cyber harassment committed solely pursuant to the element set forth in RCW 9A.90.120(1)(a)(i);

(E) Harassment;

(F) Aiming or discharging a firearm (RCW 9.41.230);

(G) Unlawful carrying or handling of a firearm (RCW 9.41.270);

(H) Animal cruelty in the second degree committed under RCW 16.52.207(1);

(I) Prior offense as defined by RCW 46.61.5055; or

(J) Violation of the provisions of an order to surrender and prohibit weapons, an extreme risk protection order, or the provisions of a protection order or no-contact order restraining the person or excluding the person from a residence; and

(ii) Three years for a conviction or finding of not guilty by reason of insanity for one or more nonfelony crimes not covered in (a)(i) of this subsection.

(b) The person petitioning for firearm rights to be restored must also meet the following requirements:

(i) Has no pending charges for any felony, gross misdemeanor, or misdemeanor crime at the time the petition is filed or during the petition process;

(ii) Has completed all sentencing conditions, other than nonrestitution fines and fees, for each felony, gross misdemeanor, or misdemeanor conviction on which the prohibition was based, including all court-ordered treatment. The court shall waive the requirement of this subsection (2)(b)(ii) if the petitioner provides verification from the sentencing court that relevant court records are no longer available, or attests to the unavailability of relevant records from other entities;

(iii) Has no prior felony convictions that would count as part of an offender score under RCW 9.94A.525 and has no out-of-state conviction for an offense which would disqualify the person from purchasing or possessing a firearm in the state of conviction. This determination shall be the responsibility of, and conducted by, the prosecuting attorney. An individual shall not be precluded from filing a petition to restore their firearm rights on the basis that they cannot verify whether they are disqualified from purchasing or possessing a firearm in the state of conviction; and

(iv) Has been determined by law enforcement based on available records and information as not subject to any other prohibition on possessing a firearm at the time the petition for the restoration of firearm rights is filed or during the petition process, and would be able to pass a background check to purchase a firearm if the petition to restore firearm rights is granted.

(3) The process for petitioning for restoration of firearm rights is as follows:

(a) The person must file a petition in a superior court in a county that entered any prohibition.

(b) At the time of filing the petition, the person must serve the prosecuting attorney in the county where the petition is filed with the petition.

(c) Upon receipt of service of the petition, the prosecuting attorney must take reasonable steps to notify the listed victim of a prohibiting crime and any person who previously obtained a full protection order or no-contact order against the person petitioning for restoration of firearm rights, if those persons have requested notification, of the procedure to provide a sworn written statement regarding the existence of any additional facts or information that they may have relevant to whether the person petitioning for restoration of firearm rights meets the requirements for restoration set forth in this section.

(d) The prosecuting attorney must verify in writing to the court that the prosecuting attorney has reviewed the relevant records, including written verification from Washington state patrol that Washington state patrol has conducted a records check of all civil and criminal records relevant to the prohibitors in RCW 9.41.040, and based on that information, whether there is sufficient evidence to determine that the person petitioning for restoration of firearm rights meets all the requirements set forth in RCW 9.41.040 and in this section to petition for and to be granted restoration of firearm rights.

(e) The court may set a hearing on the petition if the court determines additional information is necessary to determine whether the person meets the requirements for restoration of firearm rights.

(f) The court shall grant the petition only if the court finds that the person petitioning for restoration of firearm rights meets the requirements set forth in this section.

(g) The prosecuting attorney shall notify any victim who requests notification of the court's decision.

(4) When a person's right to possess a firearm has been restored under this section, the court shall forward, within three judicial days after entry of the restoration order, notification that the person's right to possess a firearm has been restored to the Washington state patrol with a copy of the person's driver's license or identicard, or comparable identification such as the person's name, address, and date of birth.

(5) By December 30, 2023, the administrative office of the courts shall develop and distribute standard forms for petitions and orders issued under this section and RCW 9.41.047, and update protection order and no-contact order forms to allow victims to opt out of the notification provided for in this section if they do not wish to be notified at the time of a petition for firearm rights restoration. Beginning January 1, 2024, courts shall use the standard forms for petitions and orders under this section and RCW 9.41.047, and the updated protection order and no-contact order forms.

(6) An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470, or combination of units of local government and its employees as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are immune from civil liability for good faith conduct in the performance of the official's, employee's, or agency's duties under this section.

[ 2023 c 295 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 295: See note following RCW 9.41.040.